Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle A. Certificate of Authority.
20 C.J.S., Corporations § 1818.

§79-4-15.04.
Amended certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state must obtain an amended certificate of authority from the Secretary of State if it changes:

Its corporate name;

The period of its duration;

Any of the information required by Section 79-35-5(a); or

The state or country of its incorporation.

The requirements of Section 79-4-15.03 for obtaining an original certificate of authority apply to obtaining an amended certificate under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 15.04; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 42, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added (a)(3); and redesignated former (a)(3) as (a)(4); and made a minor stylistic change.

Requirement that foreign corporation which changes its name obtain amended certificate of authority to transact business, see § 79-4-15.06.

Foreign corporations, certificate of authority to transact business in state, corporate name, etc., under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-363 through 79-11-381.

8 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Foreign Corporations § 122:36.

§79-4-15.05.
Effect of certificate of authority.

A certificate of authority authorizes the foreign corporation to which it is issued to transact business in this state subject, however, to the right of the state to revoke the certificate as provided in Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq.

A foreign corporation with a valid certificate of authority has the same but no greater rights and has the same but no greater privileges as, and except as otherwise provided by Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. is subject to the same duties, restrictions, penalties and liabilities now or later imposed on, a domestic corporation of like character.

Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. do not authorize this state to regulate the organization or internal affairs of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 15.05, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Foreign corporations, certificate of authority to transact business in state, corporate name, etc., under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-363 through 79-11-381.

If foreign corporation is qualified to do business in State of Mississippi, even though it may not be doing any business, its agent for process may be served and courts have personal jurisdiction over that corporation; actually doing business in state has nothing to do with personal jurisdiction where foreign corporation has qualified to do business in state; corporation qualifying to do business in state, under appropriate statutes, becomes like individual as far as suit is concerned. Read v. Sonat Offshore Drilling, Inc., 515 So. 2d 1229, 1987 Miss. LEXIS 2929 (Miss. 1987).

Neither the maintaining nor defending of any action or suit constitutes “transacting business” in the state under Mississippi law. Hyde Constr. Co. v. Koehring Co., 321 F. Supp. 1193, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13680 (D. Miss. 1969).

A foreign corporation which has never qualified to do business in Mississippi is not precluded from suing there on a policy of liability insurance issued to it in another state, in respect of a judgment recovered against it in Mississippi after its withdrawal from the state for negligence in the performance of services there. Aerial Agricultural Service, Inc. v. Till, 207 F. Supp. 50, 1962 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3655 (N.D. Miss. 1962).

Foreign corporation doing business in state in performance of contract with highway commission for construction of highway could not recover damages for delay occasioned by commission nor additional compensation for extra work performed under such contract during time it failed to comply with provision requiring filing of a copy of its charter and designation of an agent for service of process. Newell Contracting Co. v. State Highway Com., 195 Miss. 395, 15 So. 2d 700, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 172 (Miss. 1943).

Permitting highway commission, in suit against it by foreign corporation to recover for damages for delay and additional compensation for extra work under contract with commission for construction of highway in state, to set up defense that corporation failed to qualify as a foreign corporation doing business in the state, after suit had been pending for three years and complainant had taken testimony for 20 days and rested, was not error, in absence of a showing that commission had notice of the noncompliance with the statutes prior to the taking of the evidence. Newell Contracting Co. v. State Highway Com., 195 Miss. 395, 15 So. 2d 700, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 172 (Miss. 1943).

Failure of foreign corporation to file copy of its charter with secretary of state does not affect its status. Springfield Grocery Co. v. Devitt, 126 Miss. 169, 88 So. 497, 1921 Miss. LEXIS 12 (Miss. 1921).

Foreign corporations held authorized to do business in this state by this section [Code 1942, § 5344] and comity of nations. Springfield Grocery Co. v. Devitt, 126 Miss. 169, 88 So. 497, 1921 Miss. LEXIS 12 (Miss. 1921).

Foreign corporations can do nothing that domestic corporations are prohibited from doing. State ex rel. Attorney Gen. v. Edward Hinds Lumber Co., 106 Miss. 780, 64 So. 729, 1914 Miss. LEXIS 19 (Miss. 1914).

Statutes limiting holdings of domestic corporations being legislative declaration of public policy apply to foreign corporations. State ex rel. Attorney Gen. v. Edward Hinds Lumber Co., 106 Miss. 780, 64 So. 729, 1914 Miss. LEXIS 19 (Miss. 1914).

In a suit to cancel an acquittance, and to enforce an accounting between the parties in case a discovery be necessary to obtain data, the fact that defendant in such suit is a foreign corporation having its office, books and assets out of the state, and that the court may find itself powerless to grant administrative relief, if defendant declines to make discovery, is not a cause for declining to sustain the same. Clark v. Equitable Life Assurance Soc., 76 Miss. 22, 23 So. 453, 1898 Miss. LEXIS 60 (Miss. 1898).

Under this section [Code 1942, § 5344] foreign corporations may sue and be sued in this state as individual non-residents may sue and be sued. Pullman Palace-Car Co. v. Lawrence, 74 Miss. 782, 22 So. 53, 1896 Miss. LEXIS 184 (Miss. 1896).

It is no defense to a transitory action of trespass brought in this state that the wrong was done and the injury inflicted in another state, and that both plaintiff and defendant, a foreign corporation, were at the time, are now and have been continuously since, residents and citizens of such other states. Pullman Palace-Car Co. v. Lawrence, 74 Miss. 782, 22 So. 53, 1896 Miss. LEXIS 184 (Miss. 1896).

Although a note and trust deed given by a foreign corporation to secure a loan be void in the state where made, because of a disregard of statutory requirements, it cannot repudiate its contract without restoring the status quo by returning the money borrowed. Though the contract be void, if it be one free from moral turpitude, the corporation is liable for the money received thereunder.
Williams v. Bank of Commerce, 71 Miss. 858, 16 So. 238, 1894 Miss. LEXIS 34 (Miss. 1894).

A foreign corporation, whose certificate of authority to do business within the State was suspended after it filed a breach of lease action, was not required to become reinstated as a condition for proceeding to trial. Capital Associates, Inc. v. Sally Southland, Inc., 529 So. 2d 640, 1988 Miss. LEXIS 338 (Miss. 1988).

Foreign corporation’s leasing of personal property as doing business within statutes prescribing conditions of right to business.
50 A.L.R.3d 1020.

Construction work by foreign corporation as doing business for purposes of statute requiring foreign corporation to qualify as condition of access to local courts.
90 A.L.R.3d 937.

State regulation of land ownership by alien corporation.
21 A.L.R.4th 1329.

Personal liability of stockholder, officer, or agent for debt of foreign corporation doing business in the state.
27 A.L.R.4th 387.

Reinstatement of repealed, forfeited, expired, or suspended corporate charter as validating interim acts of corporation.
42 A.L.R.4th 392.

20 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1810-1827.

An analysis of Mississippi’s treatment of foreign corporations.
55 Miss. L. J. 259, June, 1985.

§79-4-15.06.
Corporate name of foreign corporation.

If the corporate name of a foreign corporation does not satisfy the requirements of Section 79-4-4.01, the foreign corporation to obtain or maintain a certificate of authority to transact business in this state:

May add the word “corporation,” “incorporated,” “company” or “limited,” or the abbreviation “corp.,” “inc.,” “co.” or “ltd.,” to its corporate name for use in this state; or

May use a fictitious name to transact business in this state if its real name is unavailable and it delivers to the Secretary of State for filing a copy of the resolution of its board of directors, certified by its secretary, adopting the fictitious name.

The corporate name of a nonprofit corporation incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state;

The name of a limited partnership, limited liability partnership or limited liability company that is organized or registered under the laws of this state and which has not been dissolved; and

A name that is reserved or registered in the Office of the Secretary of State for any of the entities named in subsection (b) which reservation or registration has not expired.

Except as authorized by subsections (c) and (d), the corporate name (including a fictitious name) of a foreign corporation must be distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from:

The corporate name of a corporation incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state;

The fictitious name of another foreign corporation or foreign limited liability company authorized to transact business in this state;

A foreign corporation may apply to the Secretary of State for authorization to use in this state the name of another corporation (incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state) that is not distinguishable upon his records from the name applied for. The Secretary of State shall authorize use of the name applied for if:

The other corporation consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking in form satisfactory to the Secretary of State to change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from the name of the applying corporation; or

The applicant delivers to the Secretary of State a certified copy of a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant’s right to use the name applied for in this state.

A foreign corporation may use in this state the name (including the fictitious name) of another domestic or foreign corporation that is used in this state if the other corporation is incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state and the foreign corporation:

Has merged with the other corporation;

Has been formed by reorganization of the other corporation; or

Has acquired all or substantially all of the assets, including the corporate name, of the other corporation.

If a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state changes its corporate name to one that does not satisfy the requirements of Section 79-4-4.01, it may not transact business in this state under the changed name until it adopts a name satisfying the requirements of Section 79-4-4.01 and obtains an amended certificate of authority under Section 79-4-15.04.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 15.06; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 40, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, in (b), deleted former (2), which read: “A corporate name reserved or registered under Section 79-4-4.02 or 79-4-4.03,” redesignated former (3) and (4) as (2) and (3), inserted “or foreign limited liability company” in (2), and added (4) and (5).

Requirement that application by foreign corporation for certificate of authority to transact business set forth name that satisfies requirements of this section, see § 79-4-15.03.

Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-101 et seq.

Foreign corporations, certificate of authority to transact business in state, corporate name, etc., under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-363 through 79-11-381.

Incorporation of company under particular name as creating exclusive right to such name.
68 A.L.R.3d 1168.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 150 et seq.

20 C.J.S., Corporations § 1887.

§79-4-15.07.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 127, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-4-15.07. [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 15.07, eff from and after January 1, 1988.]

Former § 79-4-15.07 pertained to registered office and registered agent of foreign corporation. For present provisions relating to registered agents, see §§ 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-4-15.08.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 128, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-4-15.08. [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 15.08, eff from and after January 1, 1988.]

Former § 79-4-15.08 provided for the change of an officer or registered agent of a foreign corporation. For present provisions relating to registered agents, see §§ 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-4-15.09.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 129, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-4-15.09. [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 15.09, eff from and after January 1, 1988.]

Former § 79-4-15.09 pertained to the resignation of a registered agent. For present provisions relating to registered agents, see §§ 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-4-15.10.
Service of process, demand or notice on foreign corporation.

Notice or demand required or permitted by law on a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state is governed by Section 79-35-13. Service of process is governed by the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 15.10; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 43, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment rewrote the section.

Requirement that Secretary of State deliver filed documents to corporation or representative after filing, see § 79-4-1.25.

Requirement that Secretary of State give notice in accordance with this section to foreign corporation for which he has determined that grounds exist for the revocation of its certificate of authority, and notice when certificate of authority has been revoked, see § 79-4-15.31.

Foreign corporation’s right to appeal revocation of its certificate of authority 30 days after service is perfected under § 79-4-15.10, see § 79-4-15.32.

Foreign corporations, certificate of authority to transact business in state, corporate name, etc., under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-363 through 79-11-381.

Even when jurisdiction is sought under § 79-1-27 [repealed], it is necessary for plaintiff to prove that nonresident corporation “does business” in Mississippi. Rittenhouse v. Mabry, 832 F.2d 1380, 1987 U.S. App. LEXIS 15605 (5th Cir. Miss. 1987), but see, Gross v. Chevrolet Country, 655 So. 2d 873, 1995 Miss. LEXIS 226 (Miss. 1995), cert. denied, 516 U.S. 1094, 116 S. Ct. 817, 133 L. Ed. 2d 761, 1996 U.S. LEXIS 776 (U.S. 1996).

A nonresident manufacturer of grinding machines was not amenable to suit in Mississippi by a Louisiana resident who had worked in Mississippi as an operator of such machine and who had allegedly become permanently disabled as a result of the constant inhalation of dust particles at work, where, inter alia, defendant manufacturer did not have a single employee in the state when the cause of action accrued or when the complaint was filed, even though a single corporate employee subsequently moved to the state and was served process, and where defendant had never paid state taxes or availed itself of the protection of any state laws; further, plaintiff had only avialed himself of the protection of Mississippi’s laws to the limited extent that he worked and traveled in the state. Washington v. Norton Mfg., Inc., 588 F.2d 441, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17345 (5th Cir. Miss.), cert. denied, 442 U.S. 942, 99 S. Ct. 2886, 61 L. Ed. 2d 313, 1979 U.S. LEXIS 2186 (U.S. 1979).

The Mississippi statutes providing for the method of service on a resident or a qualified foreign corporation, the “doing business” statute, and the statute providing for substituted service on any corporation doing business in the state, must be read together, and such reading leads to the inescapable conclusion that effective process under these statutes presupposes a factual determination that the foreign corporation is doing business in the State of Mississippi. Hyde Constr. Co. v. Koehring Co., 321 F. Supp. 1193, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13680 (D. Miss. 1969).

Under statute, foreign corporations are suable only when found doing business in state. Knower v. Baldwin, 195 Miss. 166, 15 So. 2d 47, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 137 (Miss. 1943); Arnett v. Carol C. & Fred R. Smith, Inc., 165 Miss. 53, 145 So. 638, 1932 Miss. LEXIS 301 (Miss. 1932).

Judgment rendered against road contractor and his foreign corporate surety held not void because when rendered surety had been dissolved and was in hands of receiver. Rawlings v. American Oil Co., 173 Miss. 683, 161 So. 851, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 236 (Miss. 1935).

Foreign corporations dissolved in domicile of its origin may be deemed alive in foreign state, so far as to afford remedies to its own citizens against property within its jurisdiction. Rawlings v. American Oil Co., 173 Miss. 683, 161 So. 851, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 236 (Miss. 1935).

Chancery court was without territorial jurisdiction of nonresident national bank not doing business in state. First Nat'l Bank v. Mississippi Cottonseed Products Co., 171 Miss. 282, 157 So. 349, 1934 Miss. LEXIS 225 (Miss. 1934).

Court, having acquired jurisdiction of foreign corporation, garnishee in suit by non-resident employee-creditor, by personal service on agent of corporation, could require answer and condemn any indebtedness due by corporation to its employee-creditor under employment contract made and performable outside state. Bean v. Bean, 166 Miss. 434, 147 So. 306, 1933 Miss. LEXIS 367 (Miss. 1933).

Foreign corporation designating resident agent is placed, as regards venue in transitory action, in same position as domestic corporation. Sandford v. Dixie Const. Co., 157 Miss. 626, 128 So. 887, 1930 Miss. LEXIS 353 (Miss. 1930).

This section [Code 1942, § 5345] does not apply to actions originating prior to its adoption. Saxony Mills v. Wagner & Co., 94 Miss. 233, 47 So. 899, 1908 Miss. LEXIS 32 (Miss. 1908).

Section 79-1-27 [repealed] applies only to non-resident corporations found doing business in Mississippi; non-resident corporation is not doing business in Mississippi where it has neither employees nor representatives in Mississippi, does not maintain offices, bank accounts or other property in state, and only contract with state is receipt of telephone and catalog orders and sale of product to Mississippi retailers. Schmid v. Roehm GmbH, 617 F. Supp. 655, 1985 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16189 (S.D. Miss. 1985).

Sections 13-3-57 and 79-1-27 [repealed] must be harmonized to support state’s valid policy of opening doors of Mississippi courts to foreign corporations found doing business in state to sue and be sued from all bona fide causes of action; merely doing business in Mississippi is not sufficient to support exercise of personal jurisdiction, and business in Mississippi of non-resident defendant must be of systematic and ongoing nature, cause of action must be incident to business activity, and assertion of jurisdiction must not offend notions of fairness and substantial justice; busline which does not maintain ticket agents, representatives, employees, offices, or property in Mississippi and which does not advertise or solicit business or negotiate or execute contracts in Mississippi but whose charter service has merely passed through state is not subject to jurisdiction for cause of action which does not arise out of activities of busline in state. Allen v. Jefferson Lines, Inc., 610 F. Supp. 236, 1985 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 19139 (S.D. Miss. 1985).

Pennsylvania corporation which maintains no offices, employees, or representatives in Mississippi, and negotiates no contracts in Mississippi is not “doing business” in Mississippi under § 79-1-27 [repealed], even though its products are sold on regular basis in Mississippi, where such sales are only as result of marketing products nationally to independent distributors who in turn sell to wholesalers and retailers, or who sell in their own outlet stores in various states. Smith v. De Walt Products Corp., 743 F.2d 277, 1984 U.S. App. LEXIS 17911 (5th Cir. Miss. 1984).

Mississippi Code § 79-1-27 [repealed], providing that any corporation doing business in Mississippi is subject to suit there, must be construed and harmonized with § 13-3-57 “doing business clause” which cannot be used by non-resident plaintiff; to extent jurisdiction over nonresident corporation in suit by non-resident plaintiff on authority of § 79-1-27 [repealed] would be contrary to intention of Mississippi legislature. Smith v. De Walt Products Corp., 743 F.2d 277, 1984 U.S. App. LEXIS 17911 (5th Cir. Miss. 1984).

The fact that the president of a foreign corporation made several trips to Mississippi in connection with plans to be performed on certain trucks and had representatives who traveled within the state soliciting the sale and installation of their products, was not sufficient to satisfy the minimal contact requirement necessary for the courts of Mississippi to acquire jurisdiction in an action against the corporation which had installed in Alabama, in a manner alleged to be negligent, a braking system on a truck which crashed into the plaintiff’s store, where all of the actual work of assembly and installation by the corporation was performed in Alabama and the owners of trucks delivered them to the plant in Alabama for these services. Collins v. Truck Equipment Sales, Inc., 231 So. 2d 187, 1970 Miss. LEXIS 1576 (Miss. 1970).

Neither the fact that a manufacturer of equipment sold its products to Mississippi distributors or wholesalers, nor the fact that the manufacturer had employees on an average of 17 or 18 per year visiting within Mississippi to give assistance to the distributors in the sale of equipment manufactured by it and to help repair and adjust such equipment, standing alone, would compel a finding that the manufacturer is or was “doing business” within the State of Mississippi under the provisions of Code 1942, § 1437 or § 5345. Hyde Constr. Co. v. Koehring Co., 321 F. Supp. 1193, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13680 (D. Miss. 1969).

Where a Wisconsin corporate manufacturer had 10 distributors in Mississippi, made substantial sales to its distributors, sent an average of 17 employees into the state each year to give assistance to its distributors, had several pieces of equipment operating within the state, extended and secured credit within the state and made contracts with its distributors, giving it considerable control over their activities, the corporation was “doing business” in Mississippi within the “long-arm” and “doing business” statutes. Hyde Constr. Co. v. Koehring Co., 321 F. Supp. 1193, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13680 (D. Miss. 1969).

When an agent of foreign finance corporation was served when he came into the state to repossess an automobile purchased by the plaintiff in a tort action for false accusations allegedly made by such finance corporation, and the foreign corporation had purchased the conditional sales contract made by the plaintiff from an automobile dealer in Louisiana, the defendant finance corporation was not doing business in the state so as to be subject to the jurisdiction of the court. Dillon v. Allen-Parker Co., 223 Miss. 359, 78 So. 2d 357, 1955 Miss. LEXIS 388 (Miss. 1955).

A financial agent may be appointed by a nonresident landlord to pay a debt or collect rents without being constituted an agent on whom process may be served. Gillentine v. Illinois Wesleyan University, 194 F.2d 970, 1952 U.S. App. LEXIS 3708 (5th Cir. Miss. 1952).

The mere presence of an agent within the state, transacting some business for a foreign corporation, is not enough to subject the latter to suit unless the agent’s activities are such as to warrant the inference that the corporation itself is present and doing business within the state. Gillentine v. Illinois Wesleyan University, 194 F.2d 970, 1952 U.S. App. LEXIS 3708 (5th Cir. Miss. 1952).

Where a foreign religious, charitable and educational corporation was not licensed to do business in the State of Mississippi, had not appointed any agent for service of process in that state and maintained no office or place of business of any kind, and its sole business was operating a university, the fact that the corporation, which owned a farm in this state which it leased to a tenant, furnished money to build a gin house on leased land and for installation of gin machinery therein does not constitute doing business. Gillentine v. Illinois Wesleyan University, 194 F.2d 970, 1952 U.S. App. LEXIS 3708 (5th Cir. Miss. 1952).

Foreign corporation was not “doing business” in state so as to subject it to suit by service of process on its traveling salesman to recover damages for personal injuries growing out of automobile collision, where such salesman sold no merchandise but merely solicited orders which were submitted to the corporation for approval, was paid by commission, used his own automobile, which he was driving at the time of the collision, and conducted his solicitation according to his own plan, although aided by suggestion or direction from time to time as to points or prospects to be covered, and subject to the general supervision of the corporation. Knower v. Baldwin, 195 Miss. 166, 15 So. 2d 47, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 137 (Miss. 1943).

Corporation was in Mississippi doing business day it was served through physician who was sole member of professional corporation, and this satisfied requirements of § 79-1-27 [repealed], where physician was only member of corporation and service was effected on physician as corporation’s agent while he was directly engaged in corporation’s business. Rittenhouse v. Mabry, 832 F.2d 1380, 1987 U.S. App. LEXIS 15605 (5th Cir. Miss. 1987), but see, Gross v. Chevrolet Country, 655 So. 2d 873, 1995 Miss. LEXIS 226 (Miss. 1995), cert. denied, 516 U.S. 1094, 116 S. Ct. 817, 133 L. Ed. 2d 761, 1996 U.S. LEXIS 776 (U.S. 1996).

If foreign corporation is qualified to do business in State of Mississippi, even though it may not be doing any business, its agent for process may be served and courts have personal jurisdiction over that corporation; actually doing business in state has nothing to do with personal jurisdiction where foreign corporation has qualified to do business in state; corporation qualifying to do business in state, under appropriate statutes, becomes like individual as far as suit is concerned. Read v. Sonat Offshore Drilling, Inc., 515 So. 2d 1229, 1987 Miss. LEXIS 2929 (Miss. 1987).

If foreign corporation is not qualified to do business in state, and is found doing business in state, it may be sued simply by serving process upon any agent of corporation in state, and Mississippi courts then have personal jurisdiction over foreign corporation. Read v. Sonat Offshore Drilling, Inc., 515 So. 2d 1229, 1987 Miss. LEXIS 2929 (Miss. 1987).

The steps required by the statute to be taken in order to give effectual notice to a foreign corporation of a suit against it are essential to the validity of the process, without which a judgment by default is void. Cudahy Packing Co. v. Smith, 191 Miss. 31, 2 So. 2d 347, 1941 Miss. LEXIS 129 (Miss. 1941).

The sending, by registered mail, by the clerk of the court, of a copy of a summons in an action against the Cudahy Packing Co., a Maine corporation, addressed to “The Cudahy Packing Co., Chicago, Ill.,” was not effectual notice to the defendant, although the return receipt bore the signature “Cudahy Packing Co., H. Bogers,” where it appeared that there were five or six corporations organized and existing under the laws of different states, all named “Cudahy Packing Co.,” and that all these corporations had their general business offices in the same building in Chicago, but that each had a different setup for the handling therein of the details of their respective corporate businesses, and the mailing of the copy of the summons was so addressed and sent as to make it uncertain whether it would be received by the particular defendant, rather than by some other person or corporation. Cudahy Packing Co. v. Smith, 191 Miss. 31, 2 So. 2d 347, 1941 Miss. LEXIS 129 (Miss. 1941).

Where a foreign corporation, which made no appearance in circuit court, and suffered a default judgment to be entered against it, appealed to the supreme court, and the record showed that the mailing of a copy of the summons had not complied with the statutory requirement so as to give the circuit court territorial jurisdiction over the corporation, if the circuit court, upon remand of the case, took jurisdiction after the issue of territorial jurisdiction was first presented and determined, the appellant corporation (which by appeal had taken notice of the pendency of the action), might then proceed upon the merits, and on appeal might still insist upon and have a review of the question of territorial jurisdiction. Cudahy Packing Co. v. Smith, 191 Miss. 31, 2 So. 2d 347, 1941 Miss. LEXIS 129 (Miss. 1941).

Plea to jurisdiction of consumer’s action against foreign corporate manufacturer for injuries allegedly caused by glass in candy made by such manufacturer and purchased from retail merchant held properly sustained, where service was had on corporation’s former agent after corporation’s withdrawal from state and it did not appear that candy allegedly causing injuries before such withdrawal was in any way connected with business done by manufacturer within the state. Walters v. Curtis Candy Co., 172 Miss. 187, 159 So. 560, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 126 (Miss. 1935).

Foreign corporation, sued for employee’s death, by moving to quash process and pleading in abatement, did not waive court’s lack of territorial jurisdiction. Arnett v. Carol C. & Fred R. Smith, Inc., 165 Miss. 53, 145 So. 638, 1932 Miss. LEXIS 301 (Miss. 1932).

In an attachment suit brought in chancery court by an Alabama citizen to recover damages from an Alabama corporation for personal injuries received as a result of a railroad crossing accident in Alabama, and to attach funds in the hands of a Mississippi corporation, where the defendant corporation owned no property or did no business in Mississippi, service of process upon an employee designated as a superintendent of the defendant corporation but who was employed by another corporation, and received no compensation from defendant corporation, was not effective to confer territorial jurisdiction over the defendant corporation. Alabama, T. & N. R. Co. v. Howell, 244 Miss. 157, 141 So. 2d 242, 1962 Miss. LEXIS 433 (Miss. 1962).

Nonresident debtor in attachment suit appearing solely for purpose of objecting, did not, thereby, submit to jurisdiction of court. Alabama Power Co. v. Jackson, 181 Miss. 691, 179 So. 571, 1938 Miss. LEXIS 109 (Miss. 1938).

Motion of nonresident national bank, not doing business in state, to quash attachment in suit against it, did not constitute general appearance. First Nat'l Bank v. Mississippi Cottonseed Products Co., 171 Miss. 282, 157 So. 349, 1934 Miss. LEXIS 225 (Miss. 1934).

Nonresident national bank’s appearance in chancery court suit for purpose of moving to quash attachment, issued against its property in violation of federal statute, did not confer territorial jurisdiction over bank on court, which should have dismissed bill as to bank after quashing attachment. First Nat'l Bank v. Mississippi Cottonseed Products Co., 171 Miss. 282, 157 So. 349, 1934 Miss. LEXIS 225 (Miss. 1934).

Nonresident national bank, not doing business in state, did not waive point that chancery court lacked jurisdiction of attachment suit against it by pleading want of territorial jurisdiction. First Nat'l Bank v. Mississippi Cottonseed Products Co., 171 Miss. 282, 157 So. 349, 1934 Miss. LEXIS 225 (Miss. 1934).

Foreign railroad corporation with line of railroad within state and property subject to execution and liable to personal judgment held, nevertheless, “nonresident” within attachment statute. Clark v. Louisville & N. R. Co., 158 Miss. 287, 130 So. 302, 1930 Miss. LEXIS 51 (Miss. 1930).

This section [Code 1942, § 5345] does not domesticate foreign corporations doing business in this state nor relieve them of liability to attachment on ground of nonresidence. Central Western Development Co. v. Lewis, 142 Miss. 428, 107 So. 557, 1926 Miss. LEXIS 100 (Miss. 1926).

Supplemental record in the supreme court on appeal from a default judgment against a foreign corporation, disclosing that the certificate of the circuit clerk as to service of process on one alleged to be the corporation’s resident agent was filed almost five months after adjournment of the trial court at which the default judgment was obtained, was not a sufficient compliance with the statutory requirement of affirmative proof of service of process on a duly appointed resident agent in order to confer jurisdiction upon the trial court. Superior Oil Co. v. Smith, 200 Miss. 782, 29 So. 2d 114, 1947 Miss. LEXIS 362 (Miss. 1947).

Default judgment against a foreign corporation was set aside where process was served on one alleged to be the corporation’s resident agent for process and a copy was properly forwarded by registered mail to its home office, but there was no proof of the appointment of such resident agent on file in the trial court at the time the case was tried. Superior Oil Co. v. Smith, 200 Miss. 782, 29 So. 2d 114, 1947 Miss. LEXIS 362 (Miss. 1947).

This section [Code 1942, § 5346] refers only to foreign corporations found doing business in this state. Knower v. Baldwin, 195 Miss. 166, 15 So. 2d 47, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 137 (Miss. 1943).

The steps required by the statute to be taken in order to give effectual notice to a foreign corporation of a suit against it are essential to the validity of the process, without which a judgment by default is void. Cudahy Packing Co. v. Smith, 191 Miss. 31, 2 So. 2d 347, 1941 Miss. LEXIS 129 (Miss. 1941).

The purpose of statute providing that, where a corporation does a local business in state without filing its charter and having an agent upon whom process may be served, process may be served on any person found representing corporation at time transaction involved took place, is to give an effectual process so as to bring a corporation into a court where judgment may be rendered, and that statute has no relation to a motion to quash process. Gridley, Maxon & Co. v. Turner, 179 Miss. 890, 176 So. 733, 177 So. 362, 1937 Miss. LEXIS 83 (Miss. 1937), overruled,
Mladinich v. Kohn, 250 Miss. 138, 164 So. 2d 785, 1964 Miss. LEXIS 451 (Miss. 1964).

Statute relating to obtaining jurisdiction of person of foreign corporation by service on agent held not to authorize suit against foreign insurance company in county other than those specified by statute controlling venue of such suits. Fireman's Fund Ins. Co. v. Cole, 169 Miss. 634, 152 So. 872, 1934 Miss. LEXIS 40 (Miss. 1934).

Court, by personal service on agent of foreign corporation doing business in this state, acquired jurisdiction of corporation, garnishee in suit by nonresident employee-creditor, and could require answer and condemn any indebtedness due by corporation to its employee-creditor under employment contract made and performable outside state. Bean v. Bean, 166 Miss. 434, 147 So. 306, 1933 Miss. LEXIS 367 (Miss. 1933).

Claimant of funds in attachment proceeding has burden of proving failure of proper service on judgment debtor. Piqua Sav. Bank v. Copiah Hardware Co., 146 Miss. 581, 111 So. 836, 1927 Miss. LEXIS 225 (Miss. 1927).

This section [Code 1942, § 5346] does not apply to action originating prior to its adoption. Saxony Mills v. Wagner & Co., 94 Miss. 233, 47 So. 899, 1908 Miss. LEXIS 32 (Miss. 1908).

Where process is personally served on construction superintendent of foreign corporation engaged in building a building in Mississippi, such corporation was properly and legally served with process under § 79-1-29 [repealed]. Holvitz v. Norfleet--Ashley, Inc., 369 F. Supp. 394, 1973 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 10631 (N.D. Miss. 1973).

Service of process on a foreign railroad company’s station agent is sufficient without mailing a copy to the home office by registered mail. Illinois C. R. Co. v. McDaniel, 246 Miss. 600, 151 So. 2d 805, 1963 Miss. LEXIS 486 (Miss. 1963).

In an attachment suit brought in chancery court by an Alabama citizen to recover damages from an Alabama corporation for personal injuries received as a result of a railroad crossing accident in Alabama, and to attach funds in the hands of a Mississippi corporation, where the defendant corporation owned no property nor did any business in Mississippi, service of process upon an employee designated as a superintendent of the defendant corporation but who was employed by another corporation, and received no compensation from defendant corporation, was not effective to confer territorial jurisdiction over the defendant corporation. Alabama, T. & N. R. Co. v. Howell, 244 Miss. 157, 141 So. 2d 242, 1962 Miss. LEXIS 433 (Miss. 1962).

Suit having been filed and process for defendant having been issued promptly by clerk, a suit was pending which tolled running of statute of limitations though process was served on plantation manager of defendant corporation and not on its designated agent for receiving of service of process. Frederick Smith Enterprise Co. v. Lucas, 204 Miss. 43, 36 So. 2d 812, 1948 Miss. LEXIS 341 (Miss. 1948).

Foreign corporation was not “doing business” in state so as to subject it to suit by service of process on its traveling salesman to recover damages for personal injuries growing out of automobile collision, where such salesman sold no merchandise but merely solicited orders which were submitted to the corporation for approval, was paid by commission, used his own automobile, which he was driving at the time of the collision, and conducted his solicitation according to his own plan, although aided by suggestion or direction from time to time as to points or prospects to be covered, and subject to the general supervision of the corporation. Knower v. Baldwin, 195 Miss. 166, 15 So. 2d 47, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 137 (Miss. 1943).

General rule that withdrawal of foreign corporation from state does not revoke local agent’s authority to receive service of process or deprive local courts of jurisdiction of actions arising out of business done within the state cannot be extended to actions not incidental to or connected with business done in state by such foreign corporation. Walters v. Curtis Candy Co., 172 Miss. 187, 159 So. 560, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 126 (Miss. 1935).

Where foreign trainmen’s brotherhood engaged in insurance business in state had never designated state insurance commissioner as its agent for service of process, service of process on officer of local lodge through whom association dealt in respect to matter in controversy, held sufficient to give court jurisdiction in suit against association. Brotherhood of Railroad Trainmen v. Agnew, 170 Miss. 604, 155 So. 205, 1934 Miss. LEXIS 155 (Miss. 1934).